Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202673-817
New proposed contract for services in excess of fifteen million dollars; proof-of-need analysis; information required; cost savings; analysis.

(1) A state agency shall not enter into a new proposed contract for services in excess of fifteen million dollars unless the state agency has conducted, prior to the advertisement for bids or the execution of the contract when section 73-813 applies, a proof-of-need analysis described in this section.

(2) The proof-of-need analysis shall require state agencies to provide a review of any expected long-term actual cost savings and an explanation of the analysis used to determine such savings or a justification for contracting the service if the proposed contract is not expected to result in cost savings to the state.

(3) Upon conclusion of the contract, if the contract was expected to result in long-term actual cost savings, the state agency shall submit an analysis of whether the contract actually produced such cost savings. If the contract did not produce the expected cost savings, the state agency shall receive certification from the division prior to entering into another contract in excess of fifteen million dollars for the same services.

Laws 2012, LB858, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB563, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 73-510;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 17.